Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-158
Joint city and school district facility; indebtedness; bonds; principal and interest; in addition to other limitations.

The amount of indebtedness, authorized to be incurred by any school district or city of the second class for the payment of principal and interest for the bonds authorized by the provisions of sections 17-156 to 17-162 shall be in addition to and over and above any limits under applicable law.

Laws 1953, c. 37, § 3, p. 128;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 46.
August 24, 2017